dictionaries/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1361 Y 27
SFX 1361 ngati ngati
SFX 1361 ngati ngam
SFX 1361 ngati ngaš
SFX 1361 ngati nga
SFX 1361 ngati ngamo
SFX 1361 ngati ngate
SFX 1361 ngati ngaju
SFX 1361 ngati ngao
SFX 1361 ngati ngala
SFX 1361 ngati ngalo
SFX 1361 ngati ngali
SFX 1361 ngati ngale
SFX 1361 ngati ngaću
SFX 1361 ngati ngaćeš
SFX 1361 ngati ngaće
SFX 1361 ngati ngaćemo
SFX 1361 ngati ngaćete
SFX 1361 ngati ngaće
SFX 1361 ngati ngaj
SFX 1361 ngati ngajmo
SFX 1361 ngati ngajte
SFX 1361 ngati ngah
SFX 1361 ngati ngaše
SFX 1361 ngati ngasmo
SFX 1361 ngati ngaste
SFX 1361 ngati njgahu
SFX 1361 ngati ngajući

SFX 1362 Y 27
SFX 1362 niti niti
SFX 1362 niti nim
SFX 1362 niti niš
SFX 1362 niti ni
SFX 1362 niti nimo
SFX 1362 niti nite
SFX 1362 niti ne
SFX 1362 niti nio
SFX 1362 niti nila
SFX 1362 niti nilo
SFX 1362 niti nili
SFX 1362 niti nile
SFX 1362 niti niću
SFX 1362 niti nićeš
SFX 1362 niti niće
SFX 1362 niti nićemo
SFX 1362 niti nićete
SFX 1362 niti niće
SFX 1362 niti ni
SFX 1362 niti nimo
SFX 1362 niti nite
SFX 1362 niti nih
SFX 1362 niti niše
SFX 1362 niti nismo
SFX 1362 niti niste
SFX 1362 niti njahu
SFX 1362 niti neći

SFX 1363 Y 28
SFX 1363 liti liti
SFX 1363 liti lim
SFX 1363 liti liš
SFX 1363 liti li
SFX 1363 liti limo
SFX 1363 liti lite
SFX 1363 liti le
SFX 1363 liti lio
SFX 1363 liti lila
SFX 1363 liti lilo
SFX 1363 liti lili
SFX 1363 liti lile
SFX 1363 liti liću
SFX 1363 liti lićeš
SFX 1363 liti liće
SFX 1363 liti lićemo
SFX 1363 liti lićete
SFX 1363 liti liće
SFX 1363 liti li
SFX 1363 liti limo
SFX 1363 liti lite
SFX 1363 liti lih
SFX 1363 liti li
SFX 1363 liti liše
SFX 1363 liti lismo
SFX 1363 liti liste
SFX 1363 liti ljahu
SFX 1363 liti livši

SFX 1364 Y 27
SFX 1364 ivati ivati
SFX 1364 ivati ujem
SFX 1364 ivati uješ
SFX 1364 ivati uje
SFX 1364 ivati ujemo
SFX 1364 ivati ujete
SFX 1364 ivati uju
SFX 1364 ivati ivao
SFX 1364 ivati ivala
SFX 1364 ivati ivalo
SFX 1364 ivati ivali
SFX 1364 ivati ivale
SFX 1364 ivati ivaću
SFX 1364 ivati ivaćeš
SFX 1364 ivati ivaće
SFX 1364 ivati ivaćemo
SFX 1364 ivati ivaćete
SFX 1364 ivati ivaće
SFX 1364 ivati uj
SFX 1364 ivati ujmo
SFX 1364 ivati ujte
SFX 1364 ivati ivah
SFX 1364 ivati ivaše
SFX 1364 ivati ivasmo
SFX 1364 ivati ivaste
SFX 1364 ivati ivahu
SFX 1364 ivati ujući

SFX 1365 Y 38
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuti
SFX 1365 gnuti gnem
SFX 1365 gnuti gneš
SFX 1365 gnuti gne
SFX 1365 gnuti gnemo
SFX 1365 gnuti gnete
SFX 1365 gnuti gnu
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuo
SFX 1365 gnuti gnula
SFX 1365 gnuti gnulo
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuli
SFX 1365 gnuti gnule
SFX 1365 gnuti gao
SFX 1365 gnuti gla
SFX 1365 gnuti glo
SFX 1365 gnuti gli
SFX 1365 gnuti gle
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuću
SFX 1365 gnuti gnućeš
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuće
SFX 1365 gnuti gnućemo
SFX 1365 gnuti gnućete
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuće
SFX 1365 gnuti gni
SFX 1365 gnuti gnimo
SFX 1365 gnuti gnite
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuh
SFX 1365 gnuti gnu
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuše
SFX 1365 gnuti gnusmo
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuste
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuhu
SFX 1365 gnuti goh
SFX 1365 gnuti že
SFX 1365 gnuti goše
SFX 1365 gnuti gosmo
SFX 1365 gnuti goste
SFX 1365 gnuti gnuvši

SFX 1366 Y 28
SFX 1366 iti iti
SFX 1366 iti im
SFX 1366 iti iš
SFX 1366 iti i
SFX 1366 iti imo
SFX 1366 iti ite
SFX 1366 iti e
SFX 1366 iti io
SFX 1366 iti ila
SFX 1366 iti ilo
SFX 1366 iti ili
SFX 1366 iti ile
SFX 1366 iti iću
SFX 1366 iti ićeš
SFX 1366 iti iće
SFX 1366 iti ićemo
SFX 1366 iti ićete
SFX 1366 iti iće
SFX 1366 iti i
SFX 1366 iti imo
SFX 1366 iti ite
SFX 1366 iti ih
SFX 1366 iti i
SFX 1366 iti iše
SFX 1366 iti ismo
SFX 1366 iti iste
SFX 1366 iti ahu
SFX 1366 iti ivši

SFX 1367 Y 29
SFX 1367 niti niti
SFX 1367 niti nim
SFX 1367 niti niš
SFX 1367 niti ni
SFX 1367 niti nimo
SFX 1367 niti nite
SFX 1367 niti ne
SFX 1367 niti nio
SFX 1367 niti nila
SFX 1367 niti nilo
SFX 1367 niti nili
SFX 1367 niti nile
SFX 1367 niti niću
SFX 1367 niti nićeš
SFX 1367 niti niće
SFX 1367 niti nićemo
SFX 1367 niti nićete
SFX 1367 niti niće
SFX 1367 niti ni
SFX 1367 niti nimo
SFX 1367 niti nite
SFX 1367 niti nih
SFX 1367 niti ni
SFX 1367 niti niše
SFX 1367 niti nismo
SFX 1367 niti niste
SFX 1367 niti njahu
SFX 1367 niti neći
SFX 1367 niti nivši

SFX 1368 Y 27
SFX 1368 eti eti
SFX 1368 eti im
SFX 1368 eti iš
SFX 1368 eti i
SFX 1368 eti imo
SFX 1368 eti ite
SFX 1368 eti i
SFX 1368 eti eo
SFX 1368 eti ela
SFX 1368 eti elo
SFX 1368 eti eli
SFX 1368 eti ele
SFX 1368 eti eću
SFX 1368 eti ećeš
SFX 1368 eti eće
SFX 1368 eti ećemo
SFX 1368 eti ećete
SFX 1368 eti eće
SFX 1368 eti i
SFX 1368 eti imo
SFX 1368 eti ite
SFX 1368 eti eh
SFX 1368 eti eše
SFX 1368 eti esmo
SFX 1368 eti este
SFX 1368 eti ehu
SFX 1368 eti eći

SFX 1369 Y 30
SFX 1369 diti diti
SFX 1369 diti dijem
SFX 1369 diti diješ
SFX 1369 diti dije
SFX 1369 diti dijemo
SFX 1369 diti dijete
SFX 1369 diti diju
SFX 1369 diti dim
SFX 1369 diti diš
SFX 1369 diti di
SFX 1369 diti dio
SFX 1369 diti dila
SFX 1369 diti dilo
SFX 1369 diti dili
SFX 1369 diti dile
SFX 1369 diti diću
SFX 1369 diti dićeš
SFX 1369 diti diće
SFX 1369 diti dićemo
SFX 1369 diti dićete
SFX 1369 diti diće
SFX 1369 diti dij
SFX 1369 diti dijmo
SFX 1369 diti dijte
SFX 1369 diti dih
SFX 1369 diti diše
SFX 1369 diti dismo
SFX 1369 diti diste
SFX 1369 diti đahu
SFX 1369 diti deći

SFX 1370 Y 27
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiti
SFX 1370 ebiti ebim
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiš
SFX 1370 ebiti ebi
SFX 1370 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1370 ebiti ebite
SFX 1370 ebiti ebe
SFX 1370 ebiti ebio
SFX 1370 ebiti ebila
SFX 1370 ebiti ebilo
SFX 1370 ebiti ebili
SFX 1370 ebiti ebile
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiću
SFX 1370 ebiti ebićeš
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1370 ebiti ebićemo
SFX 1370 ebiti ebićete
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiće
SFX 1370 ebiti ebi
SFX 1370 ebiti ebimo
SFX 1370 ebiti ebite
SFX 1370 ebiti ebih
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiše
SFX 1370 ebiti ebismo
SFX 1370 ebiti ebiste
SFX 1370 ebiti abljahu
SFX 1370 ebiti ebeći

SFX 1371 Y 27
SFX 1371 diti diti
SFX 1371 diti dim
SFX 1371 diti diš
SFX 1371 diti di
SFX 1371 diti dimo
SFX 1371 diti dite
SFX 1371 diti de
SFX 1371 diti dio
SFX 1371 diti dila
SFX 1371 diti dilo
SFX 1371 diti dili
SFX 1371 diti dile
SFX 1371 diti diću
SFX 1371 diti dićeš
SFX 1371 diti diće
SFX 1371 diti dićemo
SFX 1371 diti dićete
SFX 1371 diti diće
SFX 1371 diti di
SFX 1371 diti dimo
SFX 1371 diti dite
SFX 1371 diti dih
SFX 1371 diti diše
SFX 1371 diti dismo
SFX 1371 diti diste
SFX 1371 diti đahu
SFX 1371 diti deći

SFX 1372 Y 27
SFX 1372 ati ati
SFX 1372 ati im
SFX 1372 ati iš
SFX 1372 ati i
SFX 1372 ati imo
SFX 1372 ati ite
SFX 1372 ati e
SFX 1372 ati ao
SFX 1372 ati ala
SFX 1372 ati alo
SFX 1372 ati ali
SFX 1372 ati ale
SFX 1372 ati aću
SFX 1372 ati aćeš
SFX 1372 ati aće
SFX 1372 ati aćemo
SFX 1372 ati aćete
SFX 1372 ati aće
SFX 1372 ati i
SFX 1372 ati imo
SFX 1372 ati ite
SFX 1372 ati ah
SFX 1372 ati aše
SFX 1372 ati asmo
SFX 1372 ati aste
SFX 1372 ati ahu
SFX 1372 ati eći

SFX 1373 Y 27
SFX 1373 leti leti
SFX 1373 leti lim
SFX 1373 leti liš
SFX 1373 leti li
SFX 1373 leti limo
SFX 1373 leti lite
SFX 1373 leti le
SFX 1373 leti leo
SFX 1373 leti lela
SFX 1373 leti lelo
SFX 1373 leti leli
SFX 1373 leti lele
SFX 1373 leti leću
SFX 1373 leti lećeš
SFX 1373 leti leće
SFX 1373 leti lećemo
SFX 1373 leti lećete
SFX 1373 leti leće
SFX 1373 leti li
SFX 1373 leti limo
SFX 1373 leti lite
SFX 1373 leti leh
SFX 1373 leti leše
SFX 1373 leti lesmo
SFX 1373 leti leste
SFX 1373 leti ljahu
SFX 1373 leti leći

SFX 1374 Y 36
SFX 1374 tati tati
SFX 1374 tati ćem
SFX 1374 tati ćeš
SFX 1374 tati će
SFX 1374 tati ćemo
SFX 1374 tati ćete
SFX 1374 tati ću
SFX 1374 tati tam
SFX 1374 tati taš
SFX 1374 tati ta
SFX 1374 tati tamo
SFX 1374 tati tate
SFX 1374 tati taju
SFX 1374 tati tao
SFX 1374 tati tala
SFX 1374 tati talo
SFX 1374 tati tali
SFX 1374 tati tale
SFX 1374 tati taću
SFX 1374 tati taćeš
SFX 1374 tati taće
SFX 1374 tati taćemo
SFX 1374 tati taćete
SFX 1374 tati taće
SFX 1374 tati ći
SFX 1374 tati ćimo
SFX 1374 tati ćite
SFX 1374 tati taj
SFX 1374 tati tajmo
SFX 1374 tati tajte
SFX 1374 tati tah
SFX 1374 tati taše
SFX 1374 tati tasmo
SFX 1374 tati taste
SFX 1374 tati tahu
SFX 1374 tati ćući
