dictionaries/sr/sr-Latn.dic
bangati/1361
baštiniti/1367
bdeti/1368
bditi/1369
bebiti/1370
beleti/1373
benetati/1374
besjediti/1371
bježati/1372
blagovoleti/1373
blediti/1371
blečati/1372
bleštati/1372
bliještati/1372
bluditi/1371
blještati/1372
boleti/1373
braniti/1362
brečati/1372
briždati/1372
broditi/1371
brujati/1372
bučati/1372
vaditi/1371
vileniti/1362
voleti/1373
vrgnuti/1365
vrečati/1372
vrhuniti/1362
vrčati/1372
gaditi/1371
glediti/1371
gnjileti/1373
gorditi/1371
gospoditi/1371
gotovaniti/1362
grditi/1371
divaniti/1362
dobegnuti/1365
dovoditi/1371
doljepljivati/1364
domognuti/1365
domoliti/1363
dopičiti/1366
dostignuti/1365
docniti/1362
drečati/1372
duvaniti/1362
đoniti/1362
ždrebiti/1370
ždrijebiti/1370
žežati/1372
želeti/1373
žlebiti/1370
žlijebiti/1370
žljebiti/1370
žuditi/1371
zabacivati/1364
zabeliti/1363
zaveriti/1366
zavrgnuti/1365
zaglibljivati/1364
zadrignuti/1365
zažagriti/1366
zažvaliti/1363
zakačivati/1364
zakovrčiti/1366
zalegnuti/1365
zaljubljivati/1364
zamliječiti/1366
zanemarivati/1364
zaokoliti/1363
zapiljiti/1366
zapovrgnuti/1365
zaprskivati/1364
zasoliti/1363
zastrašivati/1364
zastrignuti/1365
zasužnjiti/1366
zahoditi/1371
zaceliti/1363
začahurivati/1364
zbičiti/1366
zviždati/1372
zvoniti/1362
zvučati/1372
zejtiniti/1362
zlijediti/1371
zrniti/1362
izbegnuti/1365
izbijeliti/1363
izvitoperivati/1364
izgnječiti/1366
izmognuti/1365
izmoliti/1363
izmudrijašiti/1366
iznajmljivati/1364
iskolačiti/1366
iskorišćivati/1364
isprašiti/1366
istegnuti/1365
istrebljivati/1364
istruliti/1363
ishoditi/1371
iscigančiti/1366
jaraniti/1362
jediti/1371
jeseniti/1362
ječati/1372
kameniti/1362
katraniti/1362
kvrčati/1372
kmečati/1372
kopniti/1362
kormaniti/1362
kreštati/1372
kruniti/1362
kuditi/1371
lebdeti/1368
ledeniti/1362
ležati/1372
lijeniti/1362
luditi/1371
mečati/1372
mileti/1373
mladiti/1371
mrsomuditi/1371
mučati/1372
navrzivati/1364
nagnuti/1365
nagoniti/1362
nagrliti/1363
nadvoditi/1371
nadmašiti/1366
nadopunjivati/1364
najvoleti/1373
nakiseliti/1363
nameračiti/1366
napenaljivati/1364
narogušiti/1366
nategnuti/1365
naćuliti/1363
našepuriti/1366
nuditi/1371
obeliti/1363
obeštećivati/1364
ovjeriti/1366
odvrgnuti/1365
odgoniti/1362
odeliti/1363
odleđivati/1364
odmjeriti/1366
odstrijeliti/1363
ožegnuti/1365
oivičiti/1366
okrunjivati/1364
opaliti/1363
optužiti/1366
osvešćivati/1364
osmeliti/1363
otegnuti/1365
otopliti/1363
othoditi/1371
otcjepljivati/1364
pirjaniti/1362
pišmaniti/1362
pištati/1372
pleniti/1362
pobeležiti/1366
pobjegnuti/1365
poganiti/1362
poguliti/1363
podvoditi/1371
podjarivati/1364
podstrignuti/1365
pokaluđeriti/1366
polegnuti/1365
pooholiti/1363
popritegnuti/1365
porubljivati/1364
postrožiti/1366
potegliti/1363
potpomognuti/1365
prevaliti/1363
pregrađivati/1364
prekardašiti/1366
premrežati/1372
prenapregnuti/1365
preraspoređivati/1364
preseliti/1363
pretegnuti/1365
prethoditi/1371
privrgnuti/1365
prigoniti/1362
prigorčiti/1366
pridijeliti/1363
priženjivati/1364
pripomognuti/1365
pritegnuti/1365
pricepljivati/1364
probijeliti/1363
provoditi/1371
progovoriti/1366
prosvijetliti/1363
profinjivati/1364
prošegačiti/1366
prštati/1372
raditi/1371
ražegnuti/1365
razveseliti/1363
razlegnuti/1365
razmesivati/1364
razrakoliti/1363
razrušiti/1366
raspaliti/1363
raspoređivati/1364
roniti/1362
rukovoditi/1371
ruštati/1372
sagnuti/1365
saguliti/1363
samjeriti/1366
samosavlađivati/1364
sapuniti/1362
sveseliti/1363
sijediti/1371
sjemeniti/1362
slijediti/1371
smognuti/1365
spiriti/1366
srditi/1371
srubljivati/1364
staliti/1363
stegnuti/1365
sustegnuti/1365
sutoniti/1362
traštati/1372
trebiti/1370
trijebiti/1370
trniti/1362
trčati/1372
ubeliti/1363
uvoditi/1371
ugriješiti/1366
udomljivati/1364
užegnuti/1365
uzoholiti/1363
uknjižiti/1366
ulegnuti/1365
uljenjivati/1364
uobliti/1363
uokružiti/1366
uprćivati/1364
usmoliti/1363
uspušiti/1366
ustrgnuti/1365
utanačivati/1364
ušestostručiti/1366
fištati/1372
hiljaditi/1371
hiniti/1362
hujati/1372
cvileti/1373
cvrčati/1372
cediti/1371
ceniti/1362
cmileti/1373
čečati/1372
čileti/1373
činiti/1362
džudžati/1372
škoditi/1371
šteniti/1362
štrčati/1372
šuštati/1372
